Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4505
Defendant; testimony contrary to statement; use of statement authorized.

(1) If a defendant testifies contrary to his or her statement made during a custodial interrogation at a place of detention which was not electronically recorded, such statement may be used for the purpose of impeachment if it is shown that the statement was freely, knowingly, voluntarily, and intelligently made.

(2) A jury instruction shall not be required if the prosecution proves, by a preponderance of the evidence, that there is a reasonable exception for there not being an electronic recording.

Laws 2008, LB179, § 5.